California statutes. Financial Code
18001.

The definitions given in this article govern the construction of this division unless the context otherwise requires.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18002.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 127.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18002.5.

“Department” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 128.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.

“Industrial loan company,” “thrift and loan company,” or “company” as used in this division means a premium finance agency as defined in Section 18560. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, these terms and this division do not apply to an industrial bank subject to, and governed by, Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 1530) of Division 1.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 66.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.1.

“Investment and loan” means an industrial loan company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.2.

(a)Any reference in a provision of any statute or regulation of this state to an industrial loan company or a thrift and loan company means an insurance premium finance agency as defined in Section 18560.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply in any of the following cases:

(1) In case the provision or a related provision expressly provides otherwise.

(2) In the case of any provision of Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) or Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 4800).

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1015, Sec. 52.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.5.

(a) When used with respect to an industrial loan company, “insured” means an industrial loan company that is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation under the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1811 et seq.).

(b) When used with respect to an investment certificate, “insured” means an investment certificate that is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation under the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1811 et
 seq.).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.6.

“Certificate of deposit” as that term is used by an industrial loan company licensed under this division means an investment certificate representing the obligation of an industrial loan company to repay a nondemand deposit as deposit is defined in Section 3(1) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.7.

“Demand deposit” means investment or thrift certificates in account, passbook, or certificate form which are redeemable and payable upon demand to the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

18004.

“Borrower” means the person receiving the proceeds or benefits of a loan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18005.

“Consumer loan or consumer obligation” means a loan made to, or an obligation incurred by, a natural person in which the money loaned, or the property delivered or service rendered under the obligation is primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18006.

“Primarily secured by real property”, as used in this division, means the fair market value of the real property less prior encumbrances, at the time the loan is made or other obligation is acquired, is more than 50 percent of the principal amount owing on the loan or obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18007.

“Charges”, as used in this division, include the aggregate interest, fees, bonuses, commissions, brokerage, discounts, expenses, and other forms of costs charged, contracted for, or received by an industrial loan company or any other person in connection with the investigating, arranging, negotiating, procuring, guaranteeing, making, servicing, collecting, or enforcing of a loan, or for forbearance of money, credit, goods, things in action, or any other service or services rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18008.

“Charges” also include any profit or advantage of any kind that any person may contract for, collect, receive, or in any manner obtain by a collateral sale, purchase, or agreement, in connection with the negotiating, arranging, making, or otherwise in connection with any loan, except commissions received on insurance sold as provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18009.

“Principal amount”, as used in this division, means the net amount of money, credit, goods, or things in action received by the debtor or borrower or disbursed on the borrower’s instructions at the time of entering into the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18010.

“Principal balance”, and “face amount” as used in this division, means the unpaid balance of a loan or other obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18011.

“Affiliated company”, as used in this division, is a company under substantially the same management or control, directly or indirectly, as the industrial loan company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18011.1.

“Affiliate” means an affiliated company or a person who, directly or indirectly, controls over 10 percent of the voting stock of an industrial loan company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 467, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18012.

“Corporate Securities Law” means the Corporate Securities Law of 1968, Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18013.

“Outstanding loans and obligations,” as used in this division, means total outstanding loans and obligations, including lease obligations, less unearned interest or charges, unearned discount, reserve or allowance for losses, and other applicable allowances or deductions as determined by regulation of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 911.)
-------------------------------------------

18014.

“Obligation” as used in Sections 18265, 18271, 18272, and 18343 includes lease obligations as authorized by Section 18310.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 911.)
-------------------------------------------

18015.

“Lease obligation” as used in this division, means a lease contract entered into by an industrial loan company as lessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 911.)
-------------------------------------------

18016.

“Investment certificates ratio”, as used in this division, means the ratio of the aggregate sum of all of the outstanding investment certificates, exclusive of those hypothecated with the company issuing them, of a company to the aggregate amount of its paid-up and unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus declared not available for dividends pursuant to Section 18319.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18373 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 7.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18016.5.

“Premium finance agency” has the meaning set forth in Section 18560.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18017.

“Assets,” as used in this division, means all assets excluding intangibles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18018.

“Capital,” as used in this division, consists of all of the following:

(a) Capital stock.

(b) Primary capital to the extent not included in capital stock.

(c) Secondary capital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18018.1.

“Primary capital,” as used in this division, means the sum of common stock, perpetual preferred stock, capital surplus, undivided profits, capital reserves, and mandatory convertible debt (to the extent of 20 percent of primary capital exclusive of that debt).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.1.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18018.2.

“Secondary capital,” as used in this division, means the sum of mandatory convertible debt that is not included in primary capital, limited life preferred stock, and subordinated notes and debentures, all in an amount up to 50 percent of primary capital. Issues of limited life preferred stock and subordinated notes and debentures, except mandatory convertible debt, shall have original weighted average maturities of at least seven years to be included within capital surplus under primary capital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.2.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18018.3.

“Perpetual preferred stock,” as used in this division, means a preferred stock that does not have a stated maturity date or that can not be redeemed at the option of the holder. It includes those issues of preferred stock that automatically convert into common stock at a stated date. It excludes those issues, the rate on which increases, or can increase, in such a manner that would effectively require the issuer to redeem the issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.3.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18018.4.

“Mandatory convertible debt,” as used in this division, means a subordinated debt instrument which requires the issuer to convert that instrument into common or perpetual preferred stock by a date at or before the maturity of the debt instrument. The maturity of those instruments shall be 12 years or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.4.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18018.5.

“Limited life preferred,” as used in this division, means preferred stock which has a maturity or which may be redeemed at the option of the holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.5.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18018.6.

“Subordinated notes and debentures,” as used in this division, means an obligation other than an investment certificate obligation that:

(a) Bears on its face, in boldface type no smaller than the largest size type used in the obligation, the following: “this obligation is not a deposit and is not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.”

(b) (1) Has a maturity of at least seven years, or (2) in the case of an obligation or issue that provides for scheduled repayments of principal, has an
 average maturity of at least seven years; however, the commissioner may permit the issuance of an obligation or issue with a shorter maturity or average maturity if the commissioner has determined that exigent circumstances require the issuance of that obligation or issue. This subdivision shall not apply to mandatory convertible obligations or issues.

(c) States expressly that the obligation is subordinated and junior in right of payment to the issuing industrial loan company’s obligations to its investment certificate holders and to the industrial loan company’s other obligations to its general and secured creditors, and is ineligible as collateral for a loan by the issuing industrial loan company.

(d) Is unsecured.

(e) States expressly that the issuing industrial loan company may not retire any part of its
 obligation without the prior written consent of the commissioner. 

(f) Includes, if the obligation is issued to a depository institution, a specific waiver of the right of offset by the lending depository institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.6.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18019.

“Capital Stock,” as used in this division, means one-class voting common stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [18020. - 18030.]

18020.

An industrial loan company shall not appoint or continue in office any officer, director or management personnel who do not have the qualifications required by Section 18117 (d).

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18021.

(a) An industrial loan company shall not deposit its funds except with a bank, trust company, or savings association authorized to do business in this state, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) An industrial loan company which is insured, as that term is defined in Section 18003.5, may also deposit its funds in an out-of-state financial institution, the accounts of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(c) Funds deposited in an out-of-state financial institution shall not in any case exceed the applicable amount of federal deposit insurance.

(d) The depository shall be approved by a majority vote of the board of directors or the executive committee, exclusive of the vote of any director who is an officer, director, trustee, or shareholder of the depository so designated. An out-of-state savings association subject to the Management Consignment Program of the Office of Thrift Supervision shall not be used as a depository.

(e) An industrial loan company shall furnish an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of the financial records of deposits pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code. No deposit shall be made in an out-of-state financial institution unless that institution agrees in writing to disclose
 financial records of the industrial loan company to the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 583.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18022.

No industrial loan company shall invest any of its funds, except as authorized in this division. Industrial loan companies may invest their funds in investments that are legal investments for commercial banks, including the capital stock, obligations, or other securities of one or more corporations, subject to rules and orders prescribed by the commissioner. Companies may also invest their funds in the choses in action issued by any other industrial loan company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18022.5.

(a) An industrial loan company may organize, sponsor, operate, control, or render investment advice to, an investment company, or underwrite, distribute, or sell securities of any investment company which has qualified to sell its securities in this state pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 1, Title 4 of the Corporations Code, if the officers and employees of the industrial loan company who sell these securities meet such standards with respect to training experience, and sales practices as established by the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee. For the purpose of this section, “investment company” means an investment company as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C., Sec. 80a-1 et seq.).

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 19.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18023.

If an industrial loan company has investment or thrift certificates outstanding, then such company shall not borrow, except by the sale of investment or thrift certificates, in an amount in excess of 300 percent of the amount represented by its outstanding capital stock, surplus and undivided profits, without the written consent of the commissioner. All sums so borrowed in excess of 150 percent of outstanding capital stock, surplus and undivided profits shall be unsecured borrowings or, if secured, approved in writing by the commissioner in advance of the borrowings, and be included as investment or thrift certificates for
 purposes of computing the ratio allowed under Sections 18319 and 18320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 142, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18023.1.

In addition to the borrowings under Section 18023, an industrial loan company may borrow funds from the Federal Home Loan Bank, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or a Federal Reserve Bank, which borrowed funds shall not be included in the borrowing limitations contained in Section 18023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18024.

An industrial loan company shall not transact business or make any loan provided for by this division under any other name than that set forth in the articles of incorporation as filed with the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18025.

No person shall use a holding company or any other device for the purpose of evading or avoiding any of the provisions of this division. This section shall not affect the right of a holding company to issue preferred stock or debentures when permitted to do so under the Corporate Securities Law of 1968. “Holding company” means any company which directly or through one or more intervening subsidiaries, whether or not wholly owned, controls or has the power to control a majority of the shares of an industrial loan company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 418, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18027.

Corporations subject to this division are not subject to the provisions or regulations of the California Financing Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 117.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18028.

All corporations formed under the provisions of this division are taxed in the same manner and at the same rates as other corporations are taxed pursuant to Section 27 of Article XIII of the Constitution of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18029.

Each industrial loan company shall keep and use in its business, books, accounts, and records which will enable the commissioner to determine if the company is complying with the provisions of this division and with the rules and regulations made by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18030.

Each industrial loan company shall preserve the books, accounts, and records, including cards used in the card system, if any, for a least two years after making the final entry on any loan or purchased obligation recorded therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Real Property Held [18040. - 18043.]

18040.

An industrial loan company may purchase, hold and convey real property for the following purposes only:

(a) Real property conveyed to it in satisfaction of debts previously contracted in the course of its business.

(b) Real property purchased at sale under judgments, decrees or mortgage foreclosures or foreclosures of or trustees’ sales under deeds of trust under securities held by it. No company shall bid at any such sale a larger amount than is necessary to satisfy its debt and costs.

(c) Real property necessary as premises for the transaction of its business. No company shall invest directly or indirectly an amount exceeding one-third of its paid-up capital stock and surplus not available for dividends as provided in Section 18319 in the lot and building in which the business of the company is carried on, leasehold improvements, furniture, fixtures, vaults, automobiles, and other personal property, necessary and proper to carry on its business.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to property acquired and held for lease pursuant to Section 18310.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18041.

(a) The commissioner may establish rules and regulations regarding the sale of any real property acquired pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 18040, consistent with what constitutes sound business practices for industrial loan companies.

(b) Real property acquired pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 18040 shall not be held for a longer period than five years without the written consent of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 873, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18042.

The authority of a three-fourths vote of all the directors is necessary to authorize the purchase of a lot and building necessary as premises for the transaction of business as an industrial loan company or to authorize the construction of such building.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18043.

Real property held by an industrial loan company shall be conveyed by an instrument under the corporate seal of the corporation, signed by the president or vice president, and the secretary or assistant secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Advertising [18055. - 18063.]

18055.

No person shall advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast, in any manner in connection with the business of an industrial loan company any statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions for making or negotiating loans, or with regard to investment certificates, which is false, misleading, or deceptive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18056.

An industrial loan company shall not use any advertising which refers to the supervision of such company by the state or any department or official thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18057.

An industrial loan company shall not use any advertising nor make any representations which indicate, imply or might lead a person to believe that the company is a savings association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 585.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18058.

An industrial loan company shall not use any advertising nor make any representations which indicate, infer or might lead a person to believe that investment certificates are insured unless such is the fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18060.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), industrial loan company which issues thrift certificates shall not use any thrift advertisement which refers to the industrial loan company’s ownership by, or affiliation with, any other entity unless the advertisement also discloses in as prominent a manner and as large a type size as the referenced ownership or affiliation was stated, whether or not the owner or affiliate so named guarantees thrift certificates issued by the industrial loan company.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a)
 applies to an insured company when the other entity guarantees the thrift certificates issued by the insured company.

(2) Subdivision (a) does not apply to an insured company when the other entity does not guarantee the thrift certificates issued by the insured company and the advertisement referring to the insured company’s ownership by, or affiliation with, the other entity does not state or imply that the assets or reserves of the other entity may be used to guarantee thrift certificates of the insured company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1011, Sec. 2.   Effective September 23, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

18061.

If an industrial loan company refers in any advertisement to rates of charge, discount, charges or costs of loans, those charges shall be stated fully and clearly in a manner as may be necessary to prevent misunderstanding thereof by prospective borrowers and to give adequate information to prospective borrowers. If the rates or costs advertised do not apply to loans of all classes, this fact shall be clearly indicated in the advertisement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18062.

An industrial loan company shall not use any advertisement after its use has been disapproved by the commissioner and the industrial loan company has been notified in writing of the disapproval. Commencing July 1, 1990, the commissioner may require a company to obtain written or oral approval of any advertisement for investment or thrift certificates prior to publication thereof in order to avoid false, misleading, or deceptive advertising.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18063.

The commissioner may require an industrial loan company to maintain a file of all advertising copy for a period of 12 months from the date of its use. The file shall be available to the commissioner upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Formation and Organization [18100. - 18166.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [18100. - 18104.]

18100.

When authorized by the commissioner as provided in this chapter, a corporation may be organized under the laws of this state, or an existing California corporation may amend its articles of incorporation, to engage in an industrial loan business. Except as otherwise provided in this division, an industrial loan company may be incorporated pursuant to Division 1 (commencing with Section 100), Title 1, of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18100.5.

Each industrial loan company, other than a premium finance agency, that has issued and has outstanding thrift obligations shall, as a condition to its authority to conduct business under this division, participate as a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18101.

If the commissioner approves an application to engage in business as an industrial loan company filed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 18115) of this chapter, he shall issue a certificate in duplicate authorizing the organization of the corporation, or the amendment of its articles of incorporation, and specifying the date on which, and the conditions under which, it may commence business as an industrial loan company, including the place where it will be located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18101.5.

Upon filing an application for approval of proposed articles of incorporation with the commissioner, or upon filing an amendment to the articles of a proposed industrial loan company changing the name of an existing corporation, the incorporators shall file an application for a certificate of reservation of the name of the proposed company as set forth in the articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 201 of the Corporations Code. The application filed with the Secretary of State shall recite the fact of the pendency of the application and the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of reservation upon such an
 application for a certificate and upon payment of any required fee. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 201 of the Corporations Code, the name contained in the certificate of reservation shall be reserved to the applicant until the commissioner refuses to issue a certificate of approval or, if a certificate is issued, as long as a certificate continues in force or effect, or for a period of up to one year from the date when the application is filed in accordance with this article, pending the applicant’s fulfillment of any requirements precedent to opening for business. The Secretary of State may, upon the request of the applicant and the approval of the commissioner, extend the reservation of the name for an additional six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18101.6.

Companies authorized to engage in the industrial loan business after the effective date of the act which added this section shall have the words “industrial loan company,” “investment and loan,” “thrift company,” “thrift and loan company,” or “bank” as part of the company name included in the articles of incorporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 586.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18102.

The articles of incorporation of an industrial loan company, in addition to the statement required by subdivision (b) of Section 202 of the Corporations Code, shall expressly state that its purpose is to engage in an industrial loan business pursuant to this division. The Secretary of State shall not file articles for the incorporation of an industrial loan company or an amendment to the articles of an existing corporation to engage in an industrial loan business unless there is filed with the Secretary of State a duplicate of the certificate issued by the commissioner pursuant to Section 18101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 478, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

18103.

An industrial loan company’s certificate to engage in the industrial loan business is not transferable or assignable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18104.

Except as otherwise authorized under existing law, no person, unless lawfully authorized to do business in this state under the provisions of this division and who is actually engaged in carrying on an industrial loan business, shall:

(a) Do business under any name or title that contains the following terms:

(1) “Industrial Loan Company.”

(2) “Investment and Loan
 Company.”

(3) “Thrift Company.”

(4) “Thrift and Loan Company.”

(b) Use any name or sign, or circulate or use any letterhead, billhead, circular, or paper, whatever, or advertise or represent in any manner that indicates or reasonably implies that the business is the character or kind of business carried on or transacted by an industrial loan business or is likely to lead any person to believe that the business is that of an industrial loan company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Applications [18115. - 18120.]

18115.

An application for authority to engage in the industrial loan business shall be in such form and contain such information as the commissioner may require and shall be accompanied by a filing fee of four hundred dollars ($400).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 725, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18116.

Upon the filing of an application, the commissioner shall make or cause to be made a careful investigation and examination relative to the following:

(a) The background and experience of the organizers or incorporators, the proposed officers and managers, and the proposed stockholders and directors.

(b) The need for industrial loan facilities or additional industrial loan facilities, as the case may be, in the community where the proposed industrial loan company is to be located, giving particular consideration to the
 adequacy of existing industrial loan facilities in the community.

(c) The ability of the community to support the proposed industrial loan company, giving consideration to (1) the competition offered by existing industrial loan companies; (2) the previous industrial loan history of the community; and (3) the opportunities for profitable employment of industrial loan funds as indicated by the average demand for credit, the number of potential investors, the volume of industrial loan transactions and the business and industries of the community with particular regard to their stability, diversification and size.

(d) Such other facts and circumstances bearing on the proposed industrial loan company as in the opinion of the commissioner may be relevant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 974, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

18117.

The commissioner, upon reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard, may deny the application for any of the following reasons:

(a) The public convenience and advantage will not be promoted by the establishment of the proposed industrial loan company.

(b) The industrial loan company is being formed for a purpose other than the legitimate objectives contemplated by this division.

(c) The proposed capital structure is inadequate.

(d) Any proposed officer, director, or shareholder of the applicant has, within the last 10 years, (1) been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to a crime, or (2) committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, which crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with the provisions of this division. 

(e) The applicant has not complied with all the applicable provisions of this division.

(f) The proposed officers and directors do not have sufficient banking, industrial loan, finance company, or other experience to afford reasonable promise of successful operation.

(g) A false statement of a material fact has been made in the application.

(h) The applicant or any officer, director, or incorporator of the applicant has violated any provision of this division or the rules thereunder or any similar regulatory scheme of a foreign jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 974, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

18119.

Within 30 days after an application is filed for authorization to establish an industrial loan company which intends to sell and issue its investment certificates, the commissioner shall give written notice of the filing of the application to each industrial loan company subject to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1011, Sec. 3.   Effective September 23, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

18120.

Before the commissioner issues a certificate of authorization to operate as an industrial loan company, there must be paid in cash for the benefit of the corporation, the minimum capital stock and minimum paid-in surplus or reserve required pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18130) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 264.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Capitalization [18130. - 18139.]

18130.

The capital stock of an industrial loan company incorporated under this division shall not be less than:

(a) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), if incorporated or commencing business on or before July 8, 1975.

(b) Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), and a paid-in surplus of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), at the time business is commenced, if incorporated or commencing business on or after July 9, 1975.

(c) Industrial loan companies
 which commenced business prior to July 9, 1975, and which do not meet the capital stock and paid-in surplus requirements of this section shall be governed until January 1, 1987, by Sections 18130, 18131, 18132, 18133, 18134, and 18135 of the Financial Code, as in effect on December 31, 1983.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 858, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

18131.

In addition to the capital stock required by Section 18130, an industrial loan company which has branch offices or which opens an additional branch office or place of business shall have additional capital stock of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each branch office.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 858, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

18132.

An industrial loan company may declare a dividend on its capital stock only if the company has minimum unimpaired capital of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) plus additional capital stock of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each branch office.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 858, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

18137.

An industrial loan company shall not reduce its capital stock to an amount less than is required by this article to be maintained by such company or less than any indebtedness of such company other than its investment certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18138.

(a) No person may acquire in the aggregate 10 percent or more of the capital stock of, or the capital of, an industrial loan company through purchase, foreclosure pursuant to a pledge or hypothecation, or other devices without the written consent of the commissioner. Prior to any person acquiring 10 percent or more of the capital stock of, or the capital of, an industrial loan company, or prior to any person acquiring additional capital stock or capital of an industrial loan company which would result in an aggregate acquisition of 10
 percent or more of the capital stock or of the capital, that person seeking the acquisition shall make written application to the commissioner requesting written consent for the acquisition.

(b) No person may acquire in the aggregate 10 percent or more of the capital stock or other securities that have voting power or control over the management of a holding company as defined in Section 18025 through purchase, foreclosure pursuant to a pledge or hypothecation, or otherwise without the written consent of the commissioner. Prior to any person acquiring 10 percent or more of the capital stock or other securities that have voting power or control over the management of a holding company as described herein, or prior to any person acquiring additional capital stock or other securities that have voting power or control over the management of a holding company as described herein which would result in an aggregate acquisition of 10 percent or more of